Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-3805
Requirements and limitations of amendment.

(a) An amendment under the Uniform Unlawful Restrictions in Land Records Act must identify the owner, the real property affected, and the document containing the unlawful restriction. The amendment must include a conspicuous statement in substantially the following form:

"This amendment removes from this deed or other document affecting title to real property an unlawful restriction as defined under the Uniform Unlawful Restrictions in Land Records Act. This amendment does not affect the validity or enforceability of a restriction that is not an unlawful restriction."

(b) The amendment must be executed and acknowledged in the manner required for recordation of a document in the land records. The amendment must be recorded in the land records of each county in which the document containing the unlawful restriction is recorded.

(c) The amendment does not affect the validity or enforceability of any restriction that is not an unlawful restriction.

(d) The amendment or a future conveyance of the affected real property is not a republication of a restriction that otherwise would expire by passage of time under other law of this state.

Laws 2025, LB21, § 5.